Nevada, session 83, SB238.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 200.605 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.605 1. [A] Unless a greater penalty is provided
pursuant to subsection 2, a person who engages in hazing is guilty
of:
(a) A misdemeanor, if no substantial bodily harm results.
(b) A gross misdemeanor, if substantial bodily harm results.
2. A person who engages in hazing on the property of a
college or university in this State is guilty of a category E felony
and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
3. Consent of a victim of hazing is not a valid defense to a
prosecution conducted pursuant to this section.
-
*SB238*

– 2 –
[3.] 4. For the purposes of this section, an activity shall be
deemed to be “forced” if initiation into or affiliation with a student
organization, academic association or athletic team is directly or
indirectly conditioned upon participation in the activity.
[4.] 5. As used in this section, “hazing” means an activity in
which a person intentionally or recklessly endangers the physical
health of another person for the purpose of initiation into or
affiliation with a student organization, academic association or
athletic team at a high school, college or university in this State. The
term:
(a) Includes, without limitation, any physical brutality or brutal
treatment, including, without limitation, whipping, beating,
branding, forced calisthenics, exposure to the elements or forced
consumption of food, liquor, drugs or other substances.
(b) Does not include any athletic, curricular, extracurricular or
quasi-military practice, conditioning or competition that is
sponsored or approved by the high school, college or university.
H
-
*SB238*